Washington statutes.
RCW 43.325.904

Effective date—2007 c 348 ss 205 and 301-307.

Sections 205 and 301 through 307 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2007.

[ 2007 c 348 s 503.]